Connecticut, session 2026, SB00272.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subparagraph (H) of subdivision (7) of subsection (c) of
section 7-148 of the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(H) (i) Secure the safety of persons in or passing through the
municipality by regulation of shows, processions, parades and music;
(ii) Regulate and prohibit the carrying on within the municipality of
any trade, manufacture, business or profession which is, or may be, so
carried on as to become prejudicial to public health, conducive to fraud
and cheating, or dangerous to, or constituting an unreasonable
annoyance to, those living or owning property in the vicinity;
(iii) Regulate auctions and garage and tag sales;
SB272 / File No. 152 1

SB272 File No. 152
(iv) Prohibit, restrain, license and regulate the business of peddlers,
auctioneers and junk dealers in a manner not inconsistent with the
general statutes;
(v) Regulate and prohibit swimming or bathing in the public or
exposed places within the municipality;
(vi) Regulate and license the operation of amusement parks and
amusement arcades including, but not limited to, the regulation of
mechanical rides and the establishment of the hours of operation;
(vii) Prohibit, restrain, license and regulate all sports, exhibitions,
public amusements and performances and all places where games may
be played;
(viii) Preserve the public peace and good order, prevent and quell
riots and disorderly assemblages and prevent disturbing noises;
(ix) Establish a system to obtain a more accurate registration of births,
marriages and deaths than the system provided by the general statutes
in a manner not inconsistent with the general statutes;
(x) Control insect pests or plant diseases in any manner deemed
appropriate;
(xi) Provide for the health of the inhabitants of the municipality and
do all things necessary or desirable to secure and promote the public
health;
(xii) Regulate the use of streets, sidewalks, highways, public places
and grounds for public and private purposes;
(xiii) Make and enforce police, sanitary or other similar regulations
and protect or promote the peace, safety, good government and welfare
of the municipality and its inhabitants;
(xiv) Regulate, in addition to the requirements under section 7-282b,
the installation, maintenance and operation of any device or equipment
in a residence or place of business which is capable of automatically
SB272 / File No. 152 2

SB272 File No. 152
calling and relaying recorded emergency messages to any state police
or municipal police or fire department telephone number or which is
capable of automatically calling and relaying recorded emergency
messages or other forms of emergency signals to an intermediate third
party which shall thereafter call and relay such emergency messages to
a state police or municipal police or fire department telephone number.
Such regulations may provide for penalties for the transmittal of false
alarms by such devices or equipment;
(xv) Make and enforce regulations for the prevention and
remediation of housing blight or blight upon any commercial real
property, including regulations reducing assessments. [and
authorizing] Any such regulations shall define blight, establish a duty
to maintain property and specify standards to determine if there is
neglect of such property, authorize designated agents of the
municipality to enter property during reasonable hours for the purpose
of remediating blighted conditions [, provided such regulations define
blight and require such] and require the municipality to give written
notice of any violation to the owner of the property upon which blighted
conditions exist and provide a reasonable opportunity for the owner to
remediate the blighted conditions prior to any enforcement action being
taken, except that a municipality may take immediate enforcement
action without providing such written notice or opportunity to
remediate in the case of a violation at a property that is the [third]
second or [more] greater such blight violation at such property during
the prior twelve-month period. [, and further provided] No such
regulations shall [not] authorize such municipality or its designated
agents to enter any dwelling house or structure on such property. [, and
including regulations establishing a duty to maintain property and
specifying standards to determine if there is neglect;] Any such
regulations shall prescribe civil penalties for the violation of such
regulations (I) for housing blight upon real property containing six or
fewer dwelling units, of not more than one hundred fifty dollars for each
day that a violation continues if such violation occurs at an occupied
property, not more than two hundred fifty dollars for each day that a
violation continues if such violation occurs at a vacant property, and not
SB272 / File No. 152 3

SB272 File No. 152
more than one thousand dollars for each day that a violation continues
at a property if such violation is the third or [more] greater such
violation at such property during the prior twelve-month period, (II) for
housing blight upon real property containing more than six but fewer
than forty dwelling units, not more than ten cents per square foot of each
residential building upon such real property for each day that a
violation continues, (III) for housing blight upon real property
containing forty or more dwelling units, not more than twelve cents per
square foot of each residential building upon such real property for each
day that a violation continues, and (IV) for blight upon any commercial
real property, not more than ten cents per square foot of any commercial
building upon such real property for each day that a violation continues.
If any such civil penalties are prescribed, such municipality shall adopt
a citation hearing procedure in accordance with section 7-152c. For the
sole purpose of determining if a violation is the [third] second or [more]
greater such violation at such property during the prior twelve-month
period, "violation" means a violation of any municipal blight regulation
for which the municipality has issued a notice of violation and either, in
the determination of such municipality, the conditions creating such
violation were previously cured or one hundred twenty days have
passed from the notice of violation and the conditions creating such
violation have not been cured. A third violation may also be established
where three or more conditions constituting such violation exist at a
property simultaneously;
100 (xvi) Regulate, on any property owned by or under the control of the
101 municipality, any activity deemed to be deleterious to public health,
102 including the burning of a lighted cigarette, cigar, pipe or similar device,
103 whether containing, wholly or in part, tobacco or cannabis, as defined
104 in section 21a-420, and the use or consumption of cannabis, including,
105 but not limited to, electronic cannabis delivery systems, as defined in
106 section 19a-342a, or vapor products, as defined in said section,
107 containing cannabis. If the municipality's population is greater than fifty
108 thousand, such regulations shall designate a place in the municipality
109 in which public consumption of cannabis is permitted. Such regulations
110 may prohibit the smoking of cannabis and the use of electronic cannabis
SB272 / File No. 152 4

SB272 File No. 152
111 delivery systems and vapor products containing cannabis in the
112 outdoor sections of a restaurant. Such regulations may prescribe
113 penalties for the violation of such regulations, provided such fine does
114 not exceed fifty dollars for a violation of such regulations regarding
115 consumption by an individual or a fine in excess of one thousand dollars
116 to any business for a violation of such regulations;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148(c)(7)(H)
PD Joint Favorable
SB272 / File No. 152 5

SB272 File No. 152
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect
All Municipalities See Below
Explanation
The bill allows municipalities to take immediate enforcement action
against blighted properties after a second violation and without
providing the owner notice of the violation and an opportunity to
remediate the blighted condition.
This may result in a potential cost to municipalities beginning in FY
to the extent more action is taken against blighted property, with a
corresponding potential revenue gain to the extent that more fines are
assessed. There is also a savings to municipalities beginning in FY 27
associated with fewer notices sent to owners of blighted property.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of blighted properties.
SB272 / File No. 152 6

SB272 File No. 152
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 272
AN ACT AUTHORIZING MUNICIPALITIES TO ENFORCE CERTAIN
BLIGHT REGULATIONS WITHOUT PROVIDING NOTICE OR AN
OPPORTUNITY TO REMEDIATE.